Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-15,178
Funding from Solid Waste Landfill Closure Assistance Fund; applicant; requirements.

In order for an applicant to receive funding from the Solid Waste Landfill Closure Assistance Fund, the applicant shall:

(1) Agree to use the funds for landfill site closing assessment, closure, monitoring, or remediation costs relating to landfills existing or already closed on July 15, 1992;

(2) Provide the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment with documentation regarding the landfill closure site, including, when appropriate, information indicating that the applicant holds or can acquire title to all lands or has the necessary easements and rights-of-way for the project and related lands;

(3) Provide a plan for the proposed project, including appropriate engineering, economic, and financial feasibility data and other data and information, including estimated costs, as may be required by the department; and

(4) Demonstrate the anticipated environmental and ecological benefits resulting from the proposed project.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 55;

Laws 1994, LB 1022, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 136;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 426.